Nevada, session 83, AB167.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. NRS 62B.215 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
62B.215 1. A child who is detained in a local facility for the
detention of children or committed to a regional facility for the
treatment and rehabilitation of children may be subjected to
corrective room restriction only if all other less-restrictive options
have been exhausted and only for the purpose of:
(a) Modifying the negative behavior of the child;
(b) Holding the child accountable for a violation of a rule of the
facility; or
(c) Ensuring the safety of the child, staff or others or ensuring
the security of the facility.
2. Any action that results in corrective room restriction for
more than 2 hours must be documented in writing and approved by
a supervisor.
3. A local facility for the detention of children or regional
facility for the treatment and rehabilitation of children shall conduct
a safety and well-being check on a child subjected to corrective
room restriction at least once every 10 minutes while the child is
subjected to corrective room restriction.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 2 –
4. A child may be subjected to corrective room restriction only
for the minimum time required to address the negative behavior,
rule violation or threat to the safety of the child, staff or others or to
the security of the facility, and the child must be returned to the
general population of the facility as soon as reasonably possible.
5. A child who is subjected to corrective room restriction for
more than 24 hours must be provided:
(a) Not less than 1 hour of out-of-room, large muscle exercise
each day, including, without limitation, access to outdoor recreation
if weather permits . [;]
(b) Access to the same meals and medical and mental health
treatment, the same access to contact with parents or legal
guardians, and the same access to legal assistance and educational
services as is provided to children in the general population of the
facility . [; and]
(c) A review of the corrective room restriction status by a
member of the staff of the facility at least once every 24 hours. Any
such review must include, without limitation, a review of whether
a referral for a mental health screening, evaluation or treatment is
appropriate. If, upon review, the corrective room restriction is
continued, the continuation must be documented in writing,
including, without limitation, an explanation as to why no other
less-restrictive option is available.
6. A local facility for the detention of children or regional
facility for the treatment and rehabilitation of children shall not
subject a child to corrective room restriction for more than 72
consecutive hours.
7. Each local facility for the detention of children and regional
facility for the treatment and rehabilitation of children shall report
monthly to the Juvenile Justice Programs Office of the Division of
Child and Family Services the number of children who were
subjected to corrective room restriction during that month and the
length of time that each child was in corrective room restriction.
Any incident that resulted in the use of corrective room restriction
for 72 consecutive hours must be addressed in the monthly report,
and the report must include the reason or reasons any attempt to
return the child to the general population of the facility was
unsuccessful.
8. As used in this section, “corrective room restriction” means
the confinement of a child to his or her room as a disciplinary or
protective action and includes, without limitation:
(a) Administrative seclusion;
(b) Behavioral room confinement;
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 3 –
(c) Corrective room rest; and
(d) Room confinement.
Sec. 2. NRS 63.505 is hereby amended to read as follows:
63.505 1. A child who is detained in a facility may be
subjected to corrective room restriction only if all other less-
restrictive options have been exhausted and only for the purpose of:
(a) Modifying the negative behavior of the child;
(b) Holding the child accountable for a violation of a rule of the
facility; or
(c) Ensuring the safety of the child, staff or others or ensuring
the security of the facility.
2. Any action that results in corrective room restriction for
more than 2 hours must be documented in writing and approved by
a supervisor.
3. A facility shall conduct a safety and well-being check on a
child subjected to corrective room restriction at least once every 10
minutes while the child is subjected to corrective room restriction.
4. A child may be subjected to corrective room restriction only
for the minimum time required to address the negative behavior,
rule violation or threat to the safety of the child, staff or others or to
the security of the facility, and the child must be returned to the
general population of the facility as soon as reasonably possible.
5. A child who is subjected to corrective room restriction for
more than 24 hours must be provided:
(a) Not less than 1 hour of out-of-room, large muscle exercise
each day, including, without limitation, access to outdoor recreation
if weather permits . [;]
(b) Access to the same meals and medical and mental health
treatment, the same access to contact with parents or legal
guardians, and the same access to legal assistance and educational
services as is provided to children in the general population of the
facility . [; and]
(c) A review of the corrective room restriction status by a
member of the staff of the facility at least once every 24 hours. Any
such review must include, without limitation, a review of whether
a referral for a mental health screening, evaluation or treatment is
appropriate. If, upon review, the corrective room restriction is
continued, the continuation must be documented in writing,
including, without limitation, an explanation as to why no other
less-restrictive option is available.
6. A facility shall not subject a child to corrective room
restriction for more than 72 consecutive hours.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 4 –
7. A facility shall report monthly to the Juvenile Justice
Programs Office of the Division of Child and Family Services the
number of children who were subjected to corrective room
restriction during that month and the length of time that each child
was in corrective room restriction. Any incident that resulted in the
use of corrective room restriction for more than 72 consecutive
hours must be addressed in the monthly report, and the report must
include the reason or reasons any attempt to return the child to the
general population of the facility was unsuccessful.
8. As used in this section, “corrective room restriction” means
the confinement of a child to his or her room as a disciplinary or
protective action and includes, without limitation:
(a) Administrative seclusion;
(b) Behavioral room confinement;
(c) Corrective room rest; and
(d) Room confinement.
20 ~~~~~ 25
-
83rd Session (2025)